Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 8 Department of Finance and Administration
25-10-129. Department of Human Services authorized to issue rules to assure compliance with federal statutes, rules, and regulations.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the State of Arkansas utilize federal funding to the fullest extent possible to provide care to persons eligible for assistance or benefits under programs wholly or partially federally funded or fundable.

The General Assembly recognizes that the Department of Human Services is presently charged with, among other things, all welfare activity in the state, including:

Services to children and to the aged, blind, and individuals with disabilities;

Public assistance; and

Medical assistance.

The General Assembly further recognizes that federal laws and regulations affecting such programs are the supreme law of the land and change frequently, sometimes with little or no advance notice to the state, such that it is impractical to prescribe the operations of such programs by statute.

It is therefore the intent of the General Assembly to clarify and consolidate the authority of the department to assure conformity with all applicable federal dictates by empowering the department and its divisions to, by rule, adopt or implement all federal statutes, rules, and regulations as may be currently in force, or as may be adopted or amended in the future, when such rule is necessary to conform to federal statutes, rules, and regulations affecting programs administered or funded by or through the department.

The department and its various divisions are hereby authorized and directed to promulgate rules, as necessary to conform to federal statutes, rules, and regulations as may now or in the future affect programs administered or funded by or through the department or its various divisions, as necessary to receive any federal funds which may now or in the future be available to the department or its various divisions.

All rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall be promulgated in conformity with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., and after legislative review and approval as required by § 10-3-309.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1258, § 1, provided: “LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS. The General Assembly finds:

“(1)Amendment 92 to the Arkansas Constitution states in part: ‘The General Assembly may provide by law for the review by a legislative committee of administrative rules promulgated by a state agency before the administrative rules become effective; and that administrative rules promulgated by a state agency shall not become effective until reviewed and approved by the legislative committee charged by law with the review of administrative rules under subdivision (a)(1) of this section’;

“(2)As Amendment 92 does not define the term ‘state agency’, the General Assembly may establish a definition by law as part of its implementation of Amendment 92;

“(3)The General Assembly at this time wishes to exclude the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education from the definition of ‘state agency’ applied to the implementation of Amendment 92; and

“(4)The General Assembly or the Legislative Council reserve the right to amend the definition of ‘state agency’ in the future to include one (1) or all of the Arkansas State Game and Fish Commission, the State Highway Commission, the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, and institutions of higher education.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment inserted “and approval” in (c).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 710, §§ 1-3; 2015, No. 1258, § 39.

25-10-130. Employee assistance programs — Prohibition of agreement for services.

The Department of Human Services shall not enter into any contract, memorandum of understanding, or interagency agreement for an employee assistance program that provides health-related services such as, but not limited to, drug or alcohol treatment services for the employees of the department.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 59.

25-10-131. Match transfer.

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services, with the approval of the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, is authorized to effect interagency fund transfers for the purpose of providing the state's matching share for payments made to that division or office, or its service providers, for services eligible for federal reimbursement under programs administered by other divisions or offices of the Department of Human Services.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 62; 2019, No. 910, § 5252.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.

25-10-132. Medical services and county operations — Use of local funds.

To the extent allowed by federal requirements, including waiver, demonstration and pilot project options, the Division of Medical Services of the Department of Human Services and the Division of County Operations of the Department of Human Services shall use local and donated funds to obtain federal matching funds to enhance federal agency programs.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 79.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2001, No. 1638, § 13 provided:

“MEDICAL SERVICES AND COUNTY OPERATIONS - USE OF LOCAL FUNDS. To the extent allowed by Federal requirements, including waiver, demonstration and pilot project options, the Division of Medical Services and the Division of County Operations shall use local and donated funds to obtain federal matching funds to enhance federal agency programs.”

25-10-133. Mental health services — Transfer provision.

Personnel positions and appropriations provided for all programs of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services may be reallocated when such actions are determined necessary to assure continued delivery of satisfactory levels of services in any of the several programs administered by the division.

Such reallocations or transfers shall be requested by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.

Any saving made in state or federal appropriations for regular salaries, extra help, Social Security and retirement matching, or maintenance and general operations, and grants for approved projects, upon prior review by the Legislative Council and approval of the Department of Finance and Administration, may be transferred to the purchase of services for persons with long-term mental illness and in the establishment, operation, and maintenance of facilities, centers, or programs for this population.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “Behavioral” for “Mental” in (a)(1).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (a)(2).

The department shall include the following requirements in all contracts with community providers who provide community transition homes for juveniles who have been adjudicated delinquent for a Class A felony criminal offense or higher, or convicted of a Class A felony or higher criminal offense, or are youthful felony sex offenders:

Prohibit the location of programs within one thousand feet (1,000') from the grounds of community centers, schools, or other facilities with a high concentration of youths;

Comply with all local zoning ordinances, including building codes;

Provide advance notice of the proposed program site to municipal and county police agencies;

Prohibit the participation in a community-based program to any individual who has re-offended within the past twelve (12) months; and

Maintain twenty-four-hour supervision of residents by provider staff.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 57, § 9, provided:

“YOUTH SERVICES — COMMUNITY-BASED RESIDENTIAL PROGRAMS — RESTRICTIONS. The Department of Human Services shall not contract or pay for community-based residential programs within any municipality to house unrelated persons who have been adjudicated delinquent of an act that would constitute a Class A felony or higher of a sexual offense or convicted of a Class A felony or higher or sexual offense until the following conditions have been met:

“1.Residents within one thousand (1,000) feet of the proposed location of the facility shall be notified by mail;

“2.A public hearing shall be conducted in the community of the proposed location of the facility by the contract provider at least ten (10) days in advance of the contract's effective date. Notice of the hearing shall be made by mail to each of the residents within 1,000 feet of the proposed location of the facility. The notification requirement shall not apply to already existing facilities at already existing locations.

“Provided further, upon establishment of such facilities within a particular municipality, the contract provider and the Department shall establish and implement a system to receive and respond to complaints and questions from residents of such municipality. In the event the Department and the provider fail to provide satisfactory communication as provided in this section to the residents, such facility may be declared a public nuisance by the municipality.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 to June 30, 2015.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” throughout (a); and deleted “within thirty (30) days of July 1, 1995” following “promulgated” in (a)(1).

Cross References. Public hearings required before locating community-based residential facilities for sex offenders, §12-25-101.

Notice of the hearing shall be made by mail to each of the residents within one thousand feet (1,000') of the proposed location of the facility; and

The notification requirement shall not apply to already-existing facilities at already-existing locations.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 57, § 9, provided:

“YOUTH SERVICES — COMMUNITY-BASED RESIDENTIAL PROGRAMS — RESTRICTIONS. The Department of Human Services shall not contract or pay for community-based residential programs within any municipality to house unrelated persons who have been adjudicated delinquent of an act that would constitute a Class A felony or higher of a sexual offense or convicted of a Class A felony or higher or sexual offense until the following conditions have been met:

“1.Residents within one thousand (1,000) feet of the proposed location of the facility shall be notified by mail;

“2.A public hearing shall be conducted in the community of the proposed location of the facility by the contract provider at least ten (10) days in advance of the contract's effective date. Notice of the hearing shall be made by mail to each of the residents within 1,000 feet of the proposed location of the facility. The notification requirement shall not apply to already existing facilities at already existing locations.

“Provided further, upon establishment of such facilities within a particular municipality, the contract provider and the Department shall establish and implement a system to receive and respond to complaints and questions from residents of such municipality. In the event the Department and the provider fail to provide satisfactory communication as provided in this section to the residents, such facility may be declared a public nuisance by the municipality.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 to June 30, 2015.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (c), substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” and substituted “Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth” for “chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth”.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (a), deleted “of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Office of Personnel Management”, deleted “of the Department of Human Services” following “Division of Youth Services”, and substituted “division” or “Division of Youth Services” three times in (a); and substituted “division” for “Division of Youth Services” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(1); and substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning transfer of the Bureau of Alcohol and Drug Abuse Prevention to the Division of Behavioral Health, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 827, § 194. The section was derived from Acts 2003, No. 1717, § 2.

(1)Provided further, upon establishment of the facilities within a particular municipality, the contract provider and the department shall establish and implement a system to receive and respond to complaints and questions from residents of the municipality.

The Department of Human Services shall notify the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs prior to privatizing any functions or responsibilities of the Division of Youth Services.

The report shall be in writing and shall be submitted to the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs at least sixty (60) days prior to entering into a contract with a private business entity.

In the event the General Assembly is in session, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall provide the report to the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs and the Chair of the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth.

All new contracts which privatize services and functions which had been performed by employees of the Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services shall include a performance evaluation provision that outlines a method for evaluating the service provided under the contract. The provision shall identify the goals and performance indicators of the contract and how the state agency intends to evaluate the service provided.

The department shall report to the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth and the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs or appropriate subcommittees thereof at least annually regarding the performance evaluation of each contract.

With the assistance of the Office of Personnel Management, the Division of Youth Services shall promulgate rules to increase the education requirements for youth service workers and security officers employed by the division. If the services are under contract with the division, the employees of the contractor shall meet the education requirements promulgated by the division.

No rule pertaining to education requirements for youth service workers or security officers promulgated hereafter by the division shall be effective until reviewed by the Legislative Council, the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs, and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or appropriate subcommittees thereof of the General Assembly.

(1)The Division of Youth Services shall promulgate rules to increase the hours of training provided to youth service workers and security officers employed by the division. If the services are under contract with the division, the employees of the contractor shall meet the training requirements promulgated by the division.

No rule pertaining to the training required of youth service workers and security officers promulgated hereafter by the division shall be effective until reviewed by the Legislative Council, the House Committee on Aging, Children and Youth, Legislative and Military Affairs, and the Senate Interim Committee on Children and Youth or appropriate subcommittees thereof of the General Assembly.

(1)(A)In every case of adjudication before the Department of Human Services, an administrative law judge shall have the power to issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses, the production of documents, or both, upon request of any party to the adjudication.

Requests for a subpoena shall be granted by the administrative law judge if the testimony or documents desired are considered necessary and material without being unduly repetitious of other available evidence.

Each subpoena shall:

State that the subpoena is issued in a proceeding pending before the department;

Contain the title of the administrative adjudication; and

Command each person to whom it is directed to appear and give testimony at the time and place therein specified.

Subpoenas may require the production of documents including:

Writings;

Drawings;

Graphs;

Charts;

Photographs;

Recordings; and

Other data compilations from which information can be obtained.

The party who requested a subpoena shall be responsible for serving the subpoena in the manner provided by law.

Return of service shall be recorded, and the record shall be retained in the adjudication case file.

ThePulaski County Circuit Court or the circuit court of the county of residence of any person duly served with a subpoena issued under this section may enforce the subpoena.

Enforcement shall be in the manner provided by law for the enforcement of subpoenas issued by a circuit court.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2017, No. 897, § 20, amended this section to delete “State Child Abuse and Neglect Prevention Board and the” preceding “Department of Health”. However, this section was specifically repealed by Acts 2017, No. 896, § 4.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning home visitation program, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 896, §4. The section was derived from Acts 2013, No. 528, § 4.

Upon motion and a showing of good cause, the presiding official may issue orders quashing or limiting subpoenas based on a determination that:

If any child served with a subpoena to be a witness in an administrative hearing is a party to an open dependency-neglect or family-in-need-of-services case, the child's attorney ad litem shall be provided a copy of the subpoena.

As used in this section, “advisory opinion” means a written statement by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services or his or her designee that explains the applicability to a specified set of facts of a pertinent statutory or regulatory provision relating to the provision of medical items or services under the medical assistance program administered by the Department of Human Services.

(1)The secretary may issue an advisory opinion at the request of a provider enrolled in the medical assistance program.

A provider may request an advisory opinion concerning:

The secretary shall not issue an advisory opinion if the request for an advisory opinion relates to a pending question raised by the provider in an ongoing or initiated investigation conducted by the Medicaid Inspector General, the Attorney General, a criminal investigation, or a civil or criminal proceeding, or if the provider has received a written notice from the secretary or the Medicaid Inspector General that advises the provider of an imminent investigation, audit, suspended claim, or withholding of payment or reimbursement.

This section does not supersede a federal regulation, law, requirement, or guidance.

The secretary shall adopt a rule establishing the time within which an advisory opinion shall be issued and the criteria for determining the eligibility of a request for departmental response.

An advisory opinion represents an expression of the views of the secretary as to the application of laws, rules, and other precedential material to the set of facts specified in the request for an advisory opinion.

A previously issued advisory opinion found by the secretary to be in error may be modified or revoked.

If the secretary modifies or revokes an advisory opinion, the modification or revocation operates prospectively.

A recovery of medical assistance overpayments caused by a provider's reliance on an advisory opinion that is later modified or revoked is prohibited for the period up until the modification or revocation unless the provider is involved in fraud.

The department promptly shall notify the provider of a modification or revocation of an advisory opinion.

An advisory opinion shall include the following notice: “This advisory opinion is limited to the person or persons who requested the opinion and it pertains only to the facts and circumstances presented in the request.”

An advisory opinion shall cite the pertinent law and rule upon which the advisory opinion is based.

An advisory opinion or a modification or revocation of a previously issued advisory opinion is a public record.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (a); and substituted “secretary” for “director” in (b)-(h).

Assist the community engagement program and staff of the Director's Office of the Division of Higher Education in setting goals, establishing priority activities, performing an advocacy role, and assisting in funding and resource development and publicity and recognition and awards programs; and

Serve as the Arkansas Service Commission for the Edward M. Kennedy Serve America Act, as governed by 42 U.S.C. § 12638.

One (1) or more members with expertise in the educational, training, and developmental needs of youth, particularly disadvantaged youth;

One (1) or more members with experience in promoting the involvement of older adults in service and volunteering;

One (1) or more members representing community-based agencies or community-based organizations;

One (1) or more members representing local governments;

One (1) or more members representing local labor organizations;

One (1) or more members representing business;

One (1) or more members between sixteen (16) and twenty-five (25) years of age who is a participant or supervisor in a volunteer or service program;

One (1) or more members representing a national service program described in 42 U.S.C. § 12572, as it existed on January 1, 2015;

The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education or his or her designee; and

One (1) or more members representing the volunteer sector.

The voting members may also include:

One (1) or more members selected from among local educators;

One (1) or more members selected from among experts in the delivery of human, educational, environmental, or public safety services to communities and persons;

One (1) or more representatives of Native American tribes;

One (1) or more members selected from among out-of-school youth or other at-risk youth; and

One (1) or more representatives of entities that receive assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, 42 U.S.C. § 4950 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2015.

The Corporation for National and Community Service may appoint an ex officio nonvoting member of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism.

The number of voting members who are state employees or officers may not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total membership.

The Governor shall ensure, to the maximum extent practicable, that the membership of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism is diverse with respect to race, ethnicity, age, gender, and disability characteristics.

Not more than fifty percent (50%) of the voting members, plus one (1) additional member, may be from the same political party.

(1)A member of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years.

The vacancy shall not affect the power of the remaining members to execute the duties of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b)(1), inserted “community engagement” and substituted “the Director's Office” for “the Division of Community Service and Nonprofit Support”; and repealed (g).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Higher Education” for “Department of Human Services” in (b)(1); substituted “Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Commissioner of Education” in (c)(2)(I); and added (c)(2)(J).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1985, No. 348, § 1, provided, in part, that the Division of State Services for the Blind and the Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind would continue to function within the Department of Human Services with the same powers prescribed by this subchapter, but that, for organizational purposes, they would be assigned to divisions or offices of the department as determined by the director.

Acts 2014, No. 114, § 4, provided:

“COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT. The Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Human Services, Division of Services for the Blind a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for Rehabilitation Counselors selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S. Department of Education Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. No state general revenue shall be expended for the tuition in pursuit of a degree authorized herein.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 983, § 4, provided: “COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT.

The Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Human Services, Division of Services for the Blind a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for Rehabilitation Counselors selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S. Department of Education Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. No state general revenue shall be expended for the tuition in pursuit of a degree authorized herein.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 89, § 4, provided: “COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT.

The Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Human Services, Division of Services for the Blind a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for Rehabilitation Counselors selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S. Department of Education Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. No state general revenue shall be expended for the tuition in pursuit of a degree authorized herein.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2016, No. 120, § 10, provided: “COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT.

Section 101(a)(7) of the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including VR counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Career Education-Arkansas Rehabilitation Services a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for any eligible employees selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S.D.O.E. Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. The waiver applies to federal financial participation (FFP), state general revenue share, and program income.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 838, § 4, provided: “COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT.

The Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including Vocational Rehabilitation Counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Human Services, Division of State Services for the Blind a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for any eligible employees selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S. Department of Education Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. No state general revenue shall be expended for the tuition in pursuit of a degree authorized herein.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Acts 2018, No. 153, § 10, provided: “COMPREHENSIVE SYSTEM OF PERSONNEL DEVELOPMENT.

Section 101(a)(7) of the Rehabilitation Act Amendments of 1992, commonly referred to as the Comprehensive System of Personnel Development (CSPD), requires State Vocational Rehabilitation (VR) agencies to establish qualified personnel standards for rehabilitation personnel, including VR counselors, that are consistent with any national or State-approved or recognized certification, licensing, or registration that apply to a particular profession. In order to comply with the Rehabilitation Act and its State Plan requirements, there is hereby authorized for the Department of Career Education-Arkansas Rehabilitation Services a general waiver of the Financial Management Guide, R1-19-4-522 Continuing Professional Education. This waiver allows the agency to provide college level coursework in degree programs for any eligible employees selected by the agency. This provision covers any and all formula and discretionary grants funded by the U.S.D.O.E. Rehabilitation Services Administration, now or in the future, including, but not limited to, the Vocational Rehabilitation Program, Supported Employment, Independent Living, and the Staff Development Grant. The waiver applies to federal financial participation (FFP), state general revenue share, and program income.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2018 through June 30, 2019.”

Cross References. Professional health services personnel, parity in compensation, §20-9-101.

School for the blind, §6-43-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 1983, No. 481, § 12: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly hereby finds and determines that an immediate need exists to improve the delivery of services to blind and visually impaired citizens of Arkansas; that the establishment of the Division of State Services for the Blind will improve the delivery of services to blind and visually impaired persons and that the efficient operation of State government will be promoted by establishing the Division at the beginning of the next fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 110: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a two (2) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 1995 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the Regular Session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 1995 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety; Section 99 shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of passage and approval and the remainder of the Act shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

Acts 2020, No. 168, § 10: July 1, 2020. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2020 is essential to the operation of the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2020 could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2020”.

The voting members of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism shall elect one (1) of the voting members to serve as chair.

A member of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism shall serve without compensation but may receive expense reimbursements in accordance with § 25-16-902.

[Repealed.]

It is the public policy of the State of Arkansas to furnish blind and visually handicapped persons those services which are reasonably necessary to allow them the opportunity to lead full, useful, and productive lives and to expend funds available for that purpose in the most efficient and effective manner possible.

The General Assembly finds that this purpose may be best accomplished by the establishment of a Division of State Services for the Blind within the Department of Commerce with the necessary authority to administer the services and programs for the blind and visually impaired.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “Department of Commerce” for “Department of Human Services” in (b).

Cited: Ark. Dep't of Human Servs. v. Clark, 304 Ark. 403, 802 S.W.2d 461 (1991).

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 86; 2013, No. 980, § 24; 2017, No. 913, § 128; 2019, No. 910, § 5253.